After reading the book on eugubic inscriptions and resuming his interest in them, he went to bed at 11 o'clock, and when he was lying in bed remembering what had happened to his wife, it was no longer so dark.
Although Anna was persistent and bitterly opposed when he told her that her situation was impossible and urged her to open up all things to her husband, deep down in her heart she considered her position to be false, dishonest, and with all her soul she wanted to change it.
When she returned from a race with her husband, she expressed everything to him at a time of excitement; despite the pain she had experienced, she was pleased with it.
After her husband left her, she told herself that she was happy that everything would be decided now, and at least there would be no lies and deception.
She felt beyond any doubt that her situation would now be determined forever.
It may be bad, it's a new position, but it's definitely not gonna be vague or false.
The pain she and her husband had in saying those words would now be rewarded by the fact that everything would be determined, she thought.
On the same evening, she saw him, but did not tell him what had happened between her and her husband, although in order for the situation to be determined, she had to tell him.
When she woke up another morning, the first thing she saw was the words she said to her husband, and those words seemed so terrible to her that she couldn't understand now how she could decide to say those strange rude words, and could not imagine what would come out of it.
But the words were spoken, and Alexis Alexandrovich left without saying anything.
"I saw Vronski and I didn't tell him.
Even the minute he left, I wanted to turn him back and tell him, but I thought, 'cause it was weird why I didn't tell him at the first minute.
Why didn't I want to tell him?"
And in response to that question, the hot paint of shame spilled over her face.
She understood what kept her from doing it; she realized that she was ashamed.
Her situation, which seemed clear last night, suddenly appeared to her not only unexplained but impossible.
She was afraid of the shame she had never thought of before.
When she thought about what her husband would do, she had the worst thoughts.
It occurred to her that the manager was about to come to kick her out of the house, that her shame would be announced to the world.
She asked herself where she was going -- when she was out of the house, and she didn't find an answer.
When she was thinking of Bronsk, she felt that he didn't like her, that he was already starting to feel bad about her, that she couldn't offer herself to him, and that she felt hostile to him for it.
She felt that the words she had said to her husband, which she constantly repeated in her imagination, that she had spoken to all of them, and that everyone had heard them.
She couldn't face the people she lived with.
She couldn't decide to call a girl and even less go downstairs and see her son and a governess.
A girl who had long listened to her door walked into her room herself.
Anna looked into her eyes and blushed in fear.
The girl apologized for coming in, saying she thought she had been called.
She brought a dress and a note.
The note was from Betsy. Betsy reminded her that Lisa Merkalov and Baroness Scholtz were going to visit her this morning with their fans, Kaluga and old Stromov, for a party of croquet.
"Come at least to see how you study morals. I'm waiting for you," she came.
Anna read the note and took a hard breath.
'Nothing, nothing is needed,' she said to Annushka, who had moved the flasks and brushes on the bathroom table. 'Come on, I'll get dressed and get out.'
It's okay, it's okay.
Annushka came out, but Anna didn't dress, but sat in the same position, lowering her head and hands, and occasionally shivered her whole body, wanting to do some gesture, say something again, and die.
She kept saying, "Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!"
But neither "god" nor "my" made any sense to her.
The thought of seeking help in religion was for her, despite the fact that she had never doubted the religion she had been raised in, as strange as seeking help from Alexey Alexandrovich himself.
She knew ahead that the help of religion was possible only under the condition of abdication of what was the whole purpose of life for her.
Not only was it hard for her, but she began to bleed fear in front of a new, never-tested state of mind.
She felt that everything in her soul began to double, as objects sometimes doubled in tired eyes.
She sometimes didn't know what she was afraid of, what she wanted.
Whether she fears or desires what is or what is or is not, she did not know.
"Oh, what am I doing?" 'She said to herself, suddenly feeling pain on both sides of her head.
When she came to her senses, she saw that she held her hair by both hands near the temples and squeezed them.
She jumped up and started walking.
'Coffee is ready, and mama and Serezia are waiting,' said Annushka, returning again and again to get Anna in the same position.
'Serges?
What is Serezha? 'When she came to life, she asked Anna, remembering her son's existence for the first time in the morning.
'He has wronged, I think,' replied, smiling, Annushka.
'How did you do it?'
'The Peaches were lying in the coal room; so it seems that they ate a little bit by themselves.'
The reminder of her son suddenly brought Anna out of the desperate situation she was in.
She remembered the partially sincere, though exaggerated, role of a mother living for her son, which she had taken over in recent years, and was happy to feel that in the state in which she had been, she had a power independent of the situation in which she would become husband and wife.
That power was a son.
Whatever her situation, she cannot leave her son.
Let her husband disgrace her and cast her out, let him cool her down, and continue to lead her independent life (again she thought of him with bile and reproach), she cannot leave her son. She has a purpose for life.
And she has to act, act to ensure that this is the situation with her son, so that he is not taken away from her.
Even sooner, we must act as soon as possible before he's taken away from her.
We should get our son and leave. Here's one thing she needs to do now.
She needed to calm down and get out of this painful situation. The thought of a direct case involving her son, of going away with him now, gave her that comfort.
She got dressed quickly, went downstairs and walked straight into the living room, where, as usual, she was waiting for her coffee and Sereza with a governess.
Serezha, all white, stood by the table under the mirror and, bent his back and head, expressing the intense attention she knew in it and to whom he looked like his father, did something to the flowers he brought.
The governess was particularly strict.
Serezha piercingly, as it was often with him, cried out, "Ah, Mother!" &lt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &gt; &lt;i&gt; &gt; &gt; &lt;i&gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; And stopped in the in the in the ; &lt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &lt; &gt; &gt; &lt; &lt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &
The governess, when she said hello, long and certain, began to tell the misdeeds of Serezia, but Anna did not listen to her; she wondered if she would take her with her.
"No, I won't," she decided. 'I will leave alone with my son.'
'Yes, it is very bad,' said Anna, and when she had taken her son by his shoulder, not by a hard but by a shy look, who had embarrassed and turned the boy, she looked at him and kissed him. 'Leave him with me,' she said to the surprised governess and sat down at the coffee table without letting out her son's hands.
'Mom!
I... I... didn't...' he said, trying to understand by her expression what he expected for a peach.
'Serezha,' she said, as soon as the governess left the room, 'it is bad, but you won't do it anymore?
Do you love me?
She felt tears in her eyes. "Can I not love him? 'She said to herself, looking at his frightened and happy look together. 'And will he be with his father to execute me?'
Will he not pity me?" Tears were already running through her face, and to cover them up, she stood up and almost ran out on the terrace.
After the stormy rains of recent days, the weather was cold, clear. With the bright sun crawling through the washed leaves, it was cold in the air.
She also shuddered from the cold and from the inner horror, with new power covering her in the clear air.
'Come, come to Mariette,' she said to Serezha, who had followed her, and started walking on the straw carpet of the terrace.
"Will they not forgive me, and see how this could not have been different?" 'She said to herself.
When she stopped and looked at the wind - swirling vertebrates of the wasp with their leaves washed clean, brightly shining in the cold sun, she realized that they would not forgive, that everyone and everyone to her would now be ruthless, like the sky, like this green. And again, she felt that her soul was beginning to double.
"Don't, don't think," she said to herself. 'We have to pack.'
Where?
When?
Who do you want me to bring?
Yeah, Moscow, on the evening train. Annushka and Serezha, and only the most basic things.
But first we have to write to both of them."
She quickly went into the house, into her office, sat down at the table and wrote to her husband:
"After what happened, I can't stay in your house anymore.
I'm leaving and taking my son with me.
I don't know the laws, so I don't know which parent my son should be with; but I take him with me, because I can't live without him.
Be generous and leave him to me."
So far, she has written quickly and naturally, but the appeal to his generosity, which she did not recognize in him, and the need to conclude a letter with something touching, has stopped her.
"I can't talk about my guilt and my remorse because..."
Again, she stopped without finding a connection in her mind.
'No,' she said to herself, 'nothing is necessary,' and by tearing the letter apart, rewriting it, deleting the reference to generosity, and sealed it.
Another letter should've been written to Wronsky. "I declared my husband," she wrote and sat there for a long time, unable to write any further.
It was so rude, so unwed.
"And then, what can I write to him?" 'She said to herself.
Again, the paint of shame covered her face, remembered his calmness, and a feeling of displeasure towards him caused her to tear into small pieces of paper with a written phrase.
"Nothing is necessary," she said to herself, and she folded the bouvar, went upstairs, announced to the governess and the people that she was going to Moscow today, and immediately started packing.
The gardeners, gardeners, and footmen used to walk all the rooms of the house, carrying out their belongings.
The wardrobes and comedies were opened; twice they ran to a shop for bats; and there was paper on the floor.
The two chests, bags and tied patches were removed to the front.
The carriage and two drivers stood by the porch.
Anna, forgetting the work of putting the inner alarms, lay her travel bag in front of the desk in her office when Annushka drew her attention to the knock of the approaching crew.
Anna looked out the window and saw at the porch a courier, Alexey Alexandrovich, who called at the front door.
'Come find out what's going on,' she said, and with calm willingness to do all things, folding her hands on her knees, sat down on the chair.
The footman brought a thick bag written by the hand of Alexey Alexandrovich.
'The courier has been ordered to bring the answer,' he said.
'All right,' she said, and as soon as the man came out, she ripped the letter with her shaking fingers.
A pack of undeployed thugs fell out of him.
She released the letter and started reading from the end.
"I have made arrangements for the move, I attribute the importance of fulfilling my request," she read.
She ran further, back, read everything, and read the letter all over again.
When she came, she felt that she was cold and that she had been struck by such a terrible misfortune as she did not expect.
She repented this morning about what she had said to her husband, and she only wanted one thing to be said, as if it weren't said. This letter acknowledged the unsaid words and gave her what she wanted.
"Right! Right! 'She has spoken.' 'Of course, he's always right, he's a Christian, he's generous!
Yeah, low, nasty man!
And none but me will understand it, nor will he understand it; and I cannot interpret it.
They say: a religious, moral, honest, intelligent man; but they do not see what I have seen.
They don't know how he choked my life for eight years, strangled everything that was alive in me, that he never once thought that I was a living woman who needed love.
They don't know how every step of the way he insulted me and stayed happy with himself.
Haven't I tried my best to find an excuse for my life?
Didn't I try to love him, love his son when I couldn't love my husband anymore?
But it's time I realized that I can't fool myself anymore, that I'm alive, that it's not my fault, that God made me so that I need to love and live.
And now what?
If he'd killed me, if he'd killed him, I'd bear it, I'd forgive everything, but no, he...
"How did I not guess what he would do?
He will do what is inherent in his low character.
He's gonna be right, and I'm gonna get killed even worse... "You can imagine what's coming for you and your son," she remembered the words in the letter.
"It's a threat that he'll take his son, and it's probably possible by their stupid law.
But don't I know why he's saying this?
He also doesn't believe in my love for my son or despises (as he has always mocked), despises my feeling, but he knows that I will not abandon my son, can't abandon my son, that without a son there can be no life for me even with someone I love, but that by leaving my son and running away from him, I will act like the most shameful, disgusting woman -- he knows and knows that I will not be able to do it."
"Our life must go as before," she remembered another phrase of the letter.
"This life has been painful before, it's been awful lately. What's it gonna be now?
And he knoweth all this, knoweth that I cannot repent of that which I breathe, that which I love; knoweth that there shall be none but lies and deception; but he shall continue to torment me.
I know him, I know he's like a fish in the water, swimming and enjoying lying.
But no, I will not give him this pleasure; I will tear apart his web of lies in which he wants to confuse me; let it be what it is.
It's better than lying and cheating."
"But how?
Oh, my God! Oh, my God!
Was a woman ever as unhappy as I am?"
'No, I will tear it up, I will tear it up!' she cried, jumping and holding back her tears.
And she went to the desk to write him another letter. But she already felt in her heart that she would not be able to tear anything apart, that she would not be able to get out of this old position, no matter how false or dishonest.
She sat down at the desk, but instead of writing, putting her hands on the table, she put her head on them, and she wept, sighing and shaking with all her breasts, as the children cry.
She cried that her dream of understanding, of defining her position, had been destroyed forever.
She knew ahead that everything would stay the same, and much worse than it was.
She felt that the situation in the light she had enjoyed, which she felt so insignificant this morning, that the situation was dear to her, that she would not be able to replace him with the disgraceful position of a woman who had abandoned her husband and son and had joined her lover; that no matter how hard she tried, she would not be stronger than herself.
She will never experience the freedom of love, but will remain forever a criminal wife, under the threat of a minute of reproof, a cheating husband for a disgraceful bond with a stranger, independent, with whom she cannot live her own life.
She knew it would be, and yet it was so awful that she couldn't even imagine how it would end.
And she wept, and she wouldn't stop crying like the children who had been punished.
The footman's footsteps made her wake up, and by hiding her face from him, she pretended to write.
'The courier asks for an answer,' reported the footman.
'The answer?'
Yes,' said Anna, 'Let him wait. I'll call you.
"What can I write? 'I thought she did.' 'What can I decide alone?
What do I know?
What do I want?
What do I love?"
Again, she felt that she was beginning to feel two in the shower. She was scared of that feeling again and grasped the first excuse she had given her for an activity that could distract her from thinking about herself.
"I have to see Alexei (that's what she's been thinking about), he alone can tell me what I have to do.
I will go to Betsy; perhaps I will see him there,' she said to herself, completely forgetting that yesterday, when she told him she wouldn't go to Princess Tverska, he said that that's why he wouldn't go either.
She came up to the table, wrote to her husband, "I got your letter. "A." --and when she called, she gave it to the footman.
'We are not going,' she said to Annushka who entered.
'Are we not going at all?'
'No, don't set it up until tomorrow, and leave the carriage.'
I'm going to the Princess's.
'What dress shall I make?'
The croquet party, to which Princess Tverskaya invited Anna, was to be composed of two ladies with their fans.
The two ladies were the main representatives of the elected new Peterburger mug, called impersonating a copy of something, les sept merveilles du monde.
The ladies belonged to a mug, though a higher one, but totally hostile to the one that Anna visited.
In addition, the old Stremov, one of the influential people of Petersburg, a fan of Lisa Merkalova, was an enemy of Alexei Alexandrovich.
For all these reasons, Anna did not want to go, and her refusal was covered by the hints of a note by Princess Tverska.
Now Anna wanted to go, in the hope of seeing Vronsky.
Anna came to see Princess Tverska before the other guests.
While she was walking in, Vronsky's footman with scrubbed bucks that looked like a johnker camera came in, too.
He stopped by the door and took off his hat and missed it.
Anna recognized him, and all she remembered was that he said he wasn't coming yesterday.
He probably sent a note about it.
She heard taking off the upper dress in the front, like a footman who spoke even r, like a camera-junker, said "from the Count of the Princess" and delivered a note.
She wanted to know where his barn was. She wanted to go back and send him a letter to come to her, or go to him.
But neither one or the other could be done: calls were already heard about her coming, and Princess Tversky's footmen were already in the middle of a doorway, waiting for her to enter the interior rooms.
'The Princess in the garden, shall be reported.'
Would you like to come to the garden? 'Reported another footman in the other room.
The situation of indecision, lack of clarity was the same as at home; even worse, because nothing could be done, it could not have been seen, but it should have stayed here in a strange and so contrary mood of society; but she was in a toilet that she knew she was going to her; she was not alone, there was this usual celebration of idleness around her, and she was easier than at home; she shouldn't have come up with what to do.
Everything was done on its own.
When she met Betsy in white, which struck her with her elegance, the toilet, Anna smiled at her as usual.
Princess Tversky was walking with Toushkevich and a relative of the young lady, to the great happiness of the provincial parents who spent the summer with the famous Princess.
Perhaps there was something special about Anna because Betsy immediately noticed it.
'I didn't sleep well,' said Anna, looking at a footman who was meeting them and, for her sake, carrying a note from Wronski.
'How glad I am that you have come,' said Betsy. 'I am tired and just wanted to have a cup of tea while they arrive. And you would go,' she turned to Tuskewich,' she said, 'Masha would try the croquet band where you were cut. We'd love to talk to you for tea, we'll have a cosy chat, wouldn't we? 'She turned to Anna with a smile, shaking her umbrella arm.
'All the more so since I can't stay long with you, I need to see the old Void.' I have promised for a hundred years,' said Anna, who has made lying, alien to her nature, not only simple and natural in society, but has even enjoyed it.
Why she said that, which she didn't think in a second, she couldn't explain.
She only said that in her mind that since Wronsky wouldn't be there, she had to ensure her freedom and try to see him somehow.
But why did she say the exact same thing about the old lady Wrath that she needed, like many others, wouldn't be able to explain, and yet, as it turned out, she couldn't come up with a better idea when she came up with the most clever means to date Wronski.
'No, I will not let you in for anything,' replied Betsy, looking carefully into Anna's face. 'Really, I would be offended if I didn't love you.
I'm sure you're afraid that my society might compromise you.
Please give us a cup of tea in the small living room,' she said, as always with her eyes on the footman.
After taking a note from him, she read it. 'Alexei has made a false jump for us,' she said in French, 'he writes that it cannot be,' she added in such a natural, simple tone as she could never think of, to have any other meaning for Anna as a croquet player.
Anna knew Betsy knew everything, but when she heard her talking about Vronsk in front of her, she always made sure for a minute that she didn't know anything.
'Ah! 'How can your society compromise anyone?' said Anna with indifference, as little interest in it, and kept smiling: 'How can your society compromise anyone? 'This game, in words, is a cover-up, like all women, had great beauty for Anna.
And not the need to hide, not the purpose for which it was hidden, but the very process of concealment attracted her. 'I can't be more Catholic than Dad,' she said. 'Stremov and Lisa Merkalov are the cream of society.
Then they were accepted everywhere, and I -- she particularly hit me -- was never hard and impatient. I just don't have time.
'No, you don't want to date Stremov, perhaps?
Let him and Alexei Alexandrovich break the spears on the committee, it's none of our business.
But in light of that, he's the kindest man I know, a passionate croquet player.
You'll see.
And despite his funny position as an old man in love with Lisa, you have to see him get out of this ridiculous position!
He's very nice.
You don't know Safo Stoltz?
It's a new, brand-new tone.
Betsy was saying all this, and yet, by the funny, smart look, her Anna felt that she understood part of her situation and was up to something.
They were in a small office.
'But you have to write to Alexei,' and Betsy sat down at the table, wrote some lines, put them in the envelope. 'I write for him to come to lunch.
I've got one lady left without a man by lunch.
See if it's convincing?
I'm sorry, I'll leave you to it for a minute.
Please seal and send,' she said from the door, 'and I have orders to make.
Never thinking for a minute, Anna sat down with Betsy's letter to the table, and without reading, she said, "I need to see you.
Come to the garden of Vreda.
I'll be there at 6:00."
She sealed it, and Betsy came back and gave her the letter.
Indeed, the tea that was brought to them on the tray table in the cool little living room between the two women became the cosy chat that Princess Tversky promised before the guests arrived.
They were overthinking those they expected, and the conversation stopped on Lisa Merkalova.
'She is very nice and I have always been pretty,' said Anna.
'You must love her. She's delusional.
Yesterday she came to me after the races and was desperate to catch you.
She says you're the real hero of a novel and that if she were a man, she would have done a thousand stupid things for you.
Stremov tells her she's already making them.
'But please tell me, I could never understand,' said Anna, 'with a few words of silence and a tone that clearly showed that she was not doing a idle question, but that what she asked was more important to her than it should be. 'Please tell me, what is her attitude toward Prince Kaluga, the so-called Mischka?'
I haven't met them much.
What is this?
Betsy smiled with her eyes and looked closely at Anna.
'New manners,' she said. 'They all chose this manner.
They threw the caps at the mills.
But there's a way and a way to get rid of them.
'Yes, but what does she have to do with Kaluga?
Betsy was suddenly having fun and laughed, which rarely happened to her.
'You're the one who's taking over Princess Soft's area.
It's a question of a terrible child -- and Betty probably wanted to, but couldn't help but laugh at the infective laughter that rarely laughed. 'We have to ask them,' she said through the tears of laughter.
'No, you're laughing,' said Anna, who was also involuntarily infected with laughter, 'but I could never understand.
I don't understand the role of husband here.
'The husband?'
Lisa Merkalova's husband carries patches behind her and is always ready for service.
And what's next, really, no one wants to know.
You know, in a good society, they don't talk or even think about some of the details of the toilet.
So is this.
'Are you going to be at Rolandaki's party? 'I asked Anna to change the conversation.'
'I don't think so,' replied Betsy, and without looking at her friend, she carefully poured small, transparent cups of sweet tea.
When she moved the cup to Anna, she took out the braid and put it in a silver pen, and she smoked it.
'You see, I am in a happy state,' she began without laughing, taking a cup into her hand. 'I understand you and I understand Lisa.
Lisa is one of those naive natures that, like children, doesn't understand what's good and what's wrong.
At least she didn't understand when she was very young.
And now she knows that this misunderstanding is coming to her.
Now maybe she doesn't understand on purpose,' said Betsy with a subtle smile. 'But it still suits her.
You see, you can look at the same thing in a tragic way and make it a torture, and you can look at it in a simple and even fun way.
Maybe you tend to look at things too tragic.
'How much I would like to know others as I know myself,' said Anna seriously and thoughtfully. 'I am worse than others, or better?' I think it's worse. 'A terrible child, a terrible child,' Betsy repeated. 'But here they are.
A man's voice was heard, then a woman's voice and laughter, and then the expected guests came in: Safo Stoltz and a radiant young man, the so - called Vaska.
He was apparently fed with blood beef, truffles, and bourgon.
She bowed to the ladies and looked at them, but only for one second.
He walked after Safo into the living room and followed her in the living room, as if he had been tied to her, and kept his eyes glittering, as if he wanted to eat her.
Safo Stoltz was a blonde with black eyes.
She walked in with her little, bastards on the cool heels of her shoes, her feet, and she shook the ladies' hands like a man.
Anna has never met this new celebrity before, and has been struck by both her beauty and the extremeness to which her toilet was brought and the courage of her manners.
On her head, her hair was made with the hair of her tender, golden light, that her head was equal to the size of a thin convex and very open from the front of the bra.
The sharpness ahead, however, was such that each movement was marked from under the dress by the shape of the knees and the upper part of the leg, and the question of where the present, small and thin, so exposed from the top and so hidden from the rear and below, really ended up in that set-up swing mountain.
Betsy rushed to introduce her to Anna.
'You can imagine we almost crushed two soldiers,' she immediately began to tell, winking, smiling, and back, pulling her tail, which she immediately pushed too far in one direction. 'I was on my way with Vashka...'
Oh, yeah, you don't know each other. 'And when she called his name, she introduced the young man and, blushing, laughed at her mistake, i.e. that she had called him the Vashka.
She bowed to Anna again, but she didn't say anything.
He turned to Safo: &lt; &lt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt;Pari is lost. &gt;&gt; &lt;i&gt; We've arrived before.
Pay up,' he said, smiling.
Sapho laughed even more fun.
'Not now,' she said.
'Never mind, I'll get it after.'
'All right, all right.
Oh, yes! 'And suddenly she turned to the mistress,' I was good...
I forgot...
I brought you a guest...
There he is...
The unexpected young guest Safo brought and forgot was, however, such an important guest that, despite his youth, both ladies stood up to meet him.
It was a new fan of Safo. He's like Vashka now, he's been following her around.
Soon the Prince of Kaluga and Lisa Merkalov arrived with Stremov.
Lisa Merkalov was a skinny brunette with an eastern lazy face and adorable, unexplained, as everyone said.
The nature of her dark toilet (Anna immediately noticed and appreciated this) was perfectly consistent with her beauty.
As much as Safo was cool and picky, Lisa was so soft and loose.
But Lisa, Anna's taste, was much more attractive. Betsy told Anna about her that she had taken on the tone of an unknown child, but when Anna saw her, she felt that it wasn't true.
She was definitely an ignorant, spoiled, but sweet, unrequited woman.
It's true that her tone was the same as Safo's tone, just like Safo's, she was followed like she was sewn up by two fans, one young old man; but there was something in it that was higher than what was around her -- it had the glitter of real diamond water in the glass. That glitter glowed out of her lovely, truly unexplained eyes.
Tired and together, the passionate view of these close - circleed eyes was striking by their perfect sincerity.
Looked into those eyes, everyone felt that he had recognized it all and that he could not help but love it. When Anna saw her, her whole face suddenly appeared with a happy smile.
'Ah, how glad I am to see you!' she said, approaching her. 'I just wanted to get to you yesterday at the races, and you left.' I really wanted to see you yesterday. Wasn't that awful? 'She said, looking at Anna with her eyes, which seemed to open her whole soul.'
'Yes, I never expected it to be so exciting,' said Anna, red.
Society rose up at that time to go to the garden.
'I will not go,' said Lisa, smiling and sitting with Anna. 'Aren't you going, too? I don't know what the fuck you want to play croquet!
'No, I love you,' said Anna.
'This is how you do that you're not bored?
If you look at you, it's fun.
You live and I miss you.
'How do you miss me?
You are the most fun society in Petersburg,' said Anna.
'Maybe those who are not our society are even more bored; but we must not be having fun, but we are terribly, terribly bored.
Safo went to the garden with two young men.
Betsy and Stremov stayed for tea.
'Are you bored?' 'Betsy said. 'Safo says they were having a lot of fun at your place yesterday.
'Oh, that was so sad! 'Lisa Merkalov said.' 'We went all the way to me after the races.'
And they're all the same, and they're the same!
It's all the same.
We've been on the couch all night.
What's so funny?
No, how do you make sure you don't get bored? 'She turned to Anna again. 'It is worth looking at you, and you see -- here is a woman who may be happy, unhappy, but not bored.
Can you teach me how you do it? 'I'm not doing anything,' replied Anna, blushing at these obsessions.
'This is the best manner,' interfered with Stremov's conversation.
Stremov was a man in his 50s, half-sediment, still fresh, very ugly, but with a characteristic and intelligent face.
Lisa Merkalov was his wife's niece, and he spent all his spare hours with her.
When he met Anna Karenina, he, in his service, the enemy of Alexey Alexandrovich, as a secular and intelligent man, tried to be with her, the wife of his enemy, especially kind. 'No way,' he picked up, smiling thinly -- that's the best tool.
I have told you a long time ago,' he turned to Lisa Merkalova, 'that in order not to be bored, one must not think that it would be boring. It's like you don't have to be afraid you won't fall asleep if you're afraid of insomnia.
That's what Anna Arkadievna told you.
'I would be very happy to say it, because it is not only clever, it is true,' said Anna, smiling.
'No, you tell me, why can't you sleep and not be bored?
'To sleep, you have to work, and to have fun, you have to work too.
'Why would I work when no one wants my job?'
And I don't know how to pretend on purpose and I don't want to.
'You are incorrigible,' said Stremov, without looking at her, and turned again to Anna.
Rarely meeting Anna, he could not say anything to her but pranks, but he spoke of these vile things, about when she moved to Petersburg, about the way Countess Lydia Ivanovna loved her -- with an expression that showed that he truly wanted to please her and show her respect and even more.
Tushkevich came in, announcing that the whole community was waiting for croquet players.
'No, don't go, please,' asked Lisa Merkalov, learning that Anna was leaving.
Stromov joined her.
'It is too much contrast,' he said, 'to go after this society to old lady Vreda.
And then you'll be angry with her, and here you'll only incite others, the nicest and the opposite of feeling,' he said to her.
Anna had a moment of indecision.
The lazy speeches of this smart man, the naive, childish sympathy that Lisa Merkalov expressed to her, and all this familiar-light environment -- it was all so easy, and it was so hard to expect her to be indissoluble at the moment, to stay, or to delay another minute of explanation.
But when she remembered that she was waiting for one house, if she did not make any decision, remembering this terrible gesture for her and remembering when she took both hands by the hair, she said goodbye and left.
In spite of his rash social life, there was a man who hated the mess.
He was humiliated when he asked for money when he was confused and has not been in that position since then.
In order to conduct his affairs in good order at all times, he has, on the basis of circumstances, more often or less often, five times a year, been isolated and has clarified all his affairs.
He called it counting, or faire la lissive.
When he woke up late the day after the races, he took up his work without shaving or bathing, dressed himself in a den, and put money, bills, letters on the table.
Petritzkay, knowing that he was angry when he woke up and saw a comrade at the desk, dressed quietly and went out without interrupting him.
Every person, knowing to the slightest detail the complexity of the conditions surrounding him, is unwilling to assume that the complexity of these conditions and the difficulty of understanding them are only his personal, accidental characteristic, and does not think that others are surrounded by the same complexity of their own personal conditions as he himself.
That's what it looked like.
And he thought, not without internal pride, that anyone else would have long been confused and forced to do the wrong thing if he had been under the same difficult circumstances.
But he felt that it was now up to him to consider and understand his situation in order not to get confused.
First, as the easiest thing to do was take up the money business.
After writing his small handwriting on his postcard all he had to do, he took stock and found that he owed 17,000 with the hundreds that he had thrown away for clarity.
After counting the money and the bank book, he found that he had a thousand and eight hundred rubles left, and no receipt was foreseen until New Year's.
After reading the list of debts, he rewritten it, dividing it into three classes.
The first category included debts that had to be paid now or, in any case, for which it was necessary to have ready-made money so that there could be no minutes of deceleration in the claim.
There were about 4,000 such debts: a thousand five hundred for a horse and two thousand five hundred for a young comrade of Venevsky, who lost that money to a brother - in - law.
At that time he wanted to give the money (they were with him), but Venevsky and Yaszwin insisted that they would pay, not Wronsky, who didn't play.
All of this was fine, but he knew that in this filthy case, in which he only took part in what he had to say for Venevsky, he had to have those two thousand and five hundred to leave the fraudster and not talk to him any more.
So, in this first critical section, you should've had 4,000.
In Division Two, 8,000, there were less important debts. The debts were mainly from the horse stable, the oats and hay supplier, the Englishman, the shornician, etc.
These debts also had to be handed over to thousands of people in order to be perfectly calm.
The last debt department -- shops, hotels and tailors -- was one that had nothing to think about.
So it took at least six thousand for running expenses, and it was only a thousand eight hundred.
For a man with a hundred thousand incomes, as the whole state of Toronto determined, such debts would not seem to be difficult; but the fact is that he did not have those hundred thousand.
The enormous father's fortune of one to two hundred thousand a year's income was indivisible among the brothers.
While the older brother married Princess Vare Chirkova, the daughter of the decabrist, without any condition, Alexei gave the older brother all of his income with his father's estate, exonerating her only twenty-five thousand a year.
Alexei then told his brother that this money would be enough for him until he got married, which is probably never gonna happen.
And the brother, in command of one of the most expensive shelves and just married, couldn't help but accept this gift.
The mother, who had a separate fortune other than the twenty-five thousand who had been reprimanded, gave Alexei another twenty thousand a year, and Alexei lived all of them.
Recently, his mother stopped sending him money after fighting with him for his connection and his departure from Moscow.
As a result, after having already made the habit of living 45,5 thousand, and having received only 25,5 thousand this year, he was now in difficulty.
To get out of this trouble, he couldn't ask his mother for money.
The last letter she received the previous day was particularly annoying to him that it contained hints that she was willing to help him succeed in the light and in the service, rather than in the life that scandalized the whole good society.
His mother's desire to buy him insulted him to the depths of his soul and further cooled her down.
But he could not disavow the words of generosity, although he now felt vaguely presumptuous about some chance of his association with Karenna, that the generous word had been made lightly, and that he, a single man, might need all 100,000 incomes.
But you couldn't deny it.
All he had to do was remember his wife's brother, and remember how that sweet, glorious Varya reminded him, at all times, that she remembered his generosity and appreciated him in order to understand the impossibility of taking it back.
It was as impossible as killing a woman, stealing or lying.
One thing was possible and should have been done, and he decided without a minute of hesitation: to borrow money from the loan shark, 10,000, which could not be difficult, to cut his expenses at all, and to sell racehorses.
When he decided to do so, he immediately wrote a note to Rolandaka, who sent him several times with an offer to buy horses from him.
Then he sent for the Englishman and the loan shark, and he put the money he had into his accounts.
After completing these cases, he wrote a cold and harsh reply to his mother's letter.
Then, after delivering three notes from Anna's wallet, he read them, burned them, and remembered his conversation with her yesterday, thought about it.
His life was particularly happy that he had a set of rules that clearly defined everything that should and should not be done.
The set of these rules hugged a very small circle of conditions, but the rules were beyond doubt, and Wronsky never hesitated for a moment to do what he had to do.
These rules clearly defined -- that the cheater should be paid, and the tailor should not -- that men should not lie, but women could -- that no one could be deceived, but a husband could -- that insults could not be forgiven and insults, etc.
All of these rules may have been unreasonable, ungood, but they were undeniable, and when they were fulfilled, he felt that he was calm and able to carry his head high.
Only very recently, with regard to his relationship with Anna, did Wronsky begin to feel that his set of rules did not fully define all the conditions, and in the future there were difficulties and doubts in which he no longer found the guiding thread.
His current attitude toward Anna and her husband was simple and clear to him.
It was clearly and accurately defined in the set of rules that guided it.
She was a decent woman who gave him her love, and he loved her, so she was to him a woman worthy of the same and even more respect than a legitimate wife.
He would have let his hand be cut off before he could afford a word, not only to insult her, but not to show her the respect a woman can expect.
Relations with society were also clear.
Everyone could have known, suspected it, but no one should have dared to speak. Otherwise, he was prepared to silence those who spoke and to respect the non-existent honour of the woman he loved.
The relationship with her husband was most clear.
From the moment Anna fell in love with Wronski, he considered one of his rights to be inalienable.
The husband was only an unnecessary and inconvenient face.
No doubt he was in a pathetic position, but what was he supposed to do?
One thing my husband was entitled to was to demand satisfaction with the weapons in his hands, and it was ready to do so from the very first minute.
But in recent times, new, internal relations have emerged between him and her, which have been a source of uncertainty.
Yesterday, she was the only one who told him she was pregnant. And he felt that this news and what she expected of him required something that was not fully defined by the code of the rules that guided him in life.
Indeed, he was taken by surprise, and the first minute she announced her position, his heart told him to leave his husband.
He said that, but now that he was thinking, he saw clearly that it would be better to do without it, and yet, speaking to himself, he was afraid -- wasn't that a bad thing?
"If I told you to leave your husband, it means joining me.
Am I ready for this?
How am I gonna take her away now that I don't have any money?
Let's just say I could arrange this... but how am I gonna take her away when I'm on duty?
If I say it, you have to be prepared for it, that is, have the money and resign."
And he thought about it.
The question of whether or not to resign led him to another, secret, one known, almost central, though hidden, interest in his life.
Honesty was an old dream of his childhood and youth, a dream he had not even admitted to himself, but which was so strong that now that passion was struggling with his love.
His first steps in light and in service were successful, but two years ago he made a grave mistake.
And he turned away from his position, hoping that it would be a great price for him; but it turned out that he had been too bold and left behind; and, willingly making himself independent, he carried it, being very subtle and clever in holding himself, as if he had not been angry at anyone, felt not wronged, and only wished that he should be left alone, for he was having fun.
In fact, since last year, when he left for Moscow, he hasn't had any fun.
He felt that it was an independent position of a man who could but didn't want to do anything, and that many began to think that he could do nothing but be honest and kind.
Having made so much noise and paid attention to his connection to Karenina, giving him a new glitter, calmed him for the time of his sharpened worm of ambition, but a week ago this worm woke up with new power.
His companion from childhood, a circle, one community and a fellow corpsman, Serpukhovsky, with whom he competed both in his class and in his gymnastics, and in his pranks, and in his dreams of ambition, returned the other day from Central Asia, receiving two points and a distinction rarely given to such young generals.
As soon as he arrived in Petersburg, they spoke of him as a rising star of the first magnitude. He was a general and he was waiting for an appointment that could influence the conduct of public affairs, and he was independent and brilliant, and love-- a lovely woman, but only a company that was allowed to be independent as much as he wanted.
"I think I'm not jealous and I can't be jealous of Serpukhovsky, but his highness shows me that it's worth waiting for time, and a man's career, like me, can be done very soon.
Three years ago, he was in the same position as me.
When I retire, I will burn my ships.
I'm not losing anything while I'm on duty.
She herself said she didn't want to change her position. And I can't be jealous of Serpukhovsky with her love."
And with the slow motion of the mustache, he stood up from the table and walked around the room, his eyes glittered especially, and he felt the firm, calm and joyful state of spirit that had always been upon him after understanding his position.
Everything was as clear and clear as it was after the previous accounts.
He shaved, dressed, took a cold bath and went out.
'I'll follow you. Your laundry has been going on for a long time now,' said Petritzka. 'Well, is it over?
'It's over,' he replied, smiling with one eye and twisting the tips of the mustache so carefully, as if after the order in which his business was brought, any too bold and fast movement could destroy it.
'You're always from the bathtub after that,' said Petritzka. I'm from Gritsky, who's called the regimental commander, waiting for you.
Although he did not answer, he looked at his comrade, thinking of another.
'Yes, is that music?' 'He said, listening to the familiar sounds of the trumpet bass, the waltz, and the waltz.' 'What holiday?'
'Serpukhovsky has arrived.
'Ah! 'I didn't know.
His smile brightened even more brightly.
Having decided with himself that he was happy with his love, he sacrificed his ambition to her, &quot; taking over at least this role &quot;, he could no longer feel jealous of Serpukhovsky, nor was he angry with him for coming to the regiment and not coming to him first.
Serpukhovsky was a good friend, and he was happy with him.
'Ah, I am very pleased.
Colonel Demin occupied a large settlement house. The whole society was on the spacious lower balcony.
In the yard, the first thing that popped into the eyes of Vronski was the songwriters in the bunks, standing by a barrel of vodka, and the healthy, funny figure of a regimental commander surrounded by officers; when he came out to the first stage of the balcony, he screamed loudly over the music played by the Offenbach frame, ordered something and waved to the soldiers standing aside.
A bunch of soldiers, a wachmist and a few non-commissioned officers approached the balcony with Vronski.
On his return to the table, the regimental commander again went out with a glass on the porch and made a toast: "For the health of our former comrade and brave General Prince Serpukhovsky.
Yay!"
After the regimental commander, with a glass in his hand, smiling, Serpukhovsky went out.
'You are getting younger and younger, Bondarenko,' he turned to a man standing in front of him, who served second service as a fine-looking red-eyed wahmyster.
He hasn't seen Serpukhovsky in three years.
He got married by letting the buckenbards go, but he was just as thin, not so beautiful as the tenderness and magnanimity of his face and addition.
One change noted in him was the quiet, constant radiance that is set on the faces of those who are successful and confident of the recognition of this success by all.
He knew the radiance and immediately noticed it in Serpukhovsky.
On his way down the stairs, Serpukhovsky saw Vronski.
The smile of joy lit up Serpukhovsky's face.
He nodded his head up, raised his glass, and--and showed with this gesture that he could not but approach the wachmist, who had reached out and had already folded his lips for a kiss.
'Well, there he is!' cried the regiment commander. 'And I was told by Yaszvin that you were in your darkest spirit.
Serpukhovsky kissed the wet and fresh lips of the young wahmister, and wiped his mouth with a handkerchief, and went up to him.
'Well, how glad I am! 'He said, shaking his hand and pulling him aside.'
'Take care of him! 'Yashvin was screamed by the regimental commander, pointing to Vronski, and went downstairs to the soldiers.'
'Why weren't you at the races yesterday?
I thought I'd see you there,' he said, looking around Serpukhovsky.
'I have arrived, but late.
'It's my fault,' he added, and turned to the Adjutant, 'please order me to give out how much a person will get.
And he got three paperworks out of his wallet in a hurry, and he blushed.
'Vronsky! Eat something or drink? 'Yashvin asked.' 'Hey, let the count eat here!
Here, drink this.
The regimental commander's cottage lasted a long time.
We drank a lot.
They rocked and planted Serpukhovsky.
Then the regimental commander was rocked.
Then the regimental commander and Petritzki danced in front of the songs.
Then the regimental commander, already a bit weak, sat in the yard on a shop and began to prove to Yashwin Russia's advantage before Prussia, especially in the Cavalry attack, and the trench for a minute quiet.
Serpukhovsky went into the house, into the bathroom, to wash his hands, and found him there, and he was filled with water.
He took off his den, rubbing his hair with a red neck under the rinsing of the washer, rubbing it and his head with his hands.
When he finished washing, he sat down with Serpukhovsky. They both got on the couch right away, and they started a conversation that was very interesting for both of them.
'I knew everything about you through my wife,' said Serpukhovsky. 'I'm glad you've seen her a lot.
'She is friendly with Varia, and these are the only women in Petrenburg whom I am pleased to see,' replied Wronsky, smiling.
He smiled at what he saw coming, and it was good for him.
'The only ones?' 'Smile, asked Serpukhovsky again.'
'Yeah, and I knew about you, but not only through your wife,' said Vronsky with a strict expression of his face, prohibiting this hint. 'I was very pleased with your success, and not surprised at all.
I've been waiting for more...
Serpukhovsky smiled.
He apparently enjoyed this view of him, and he did not find it necessary to hide it.
'I, on the other hand, have come to confess frankly, I have waited less.
But I'm glad, I'm so glad. I'm ambitious, it's my weakness, and I'll admit it.
'Maybe you wouldn't have confessed if you hadn't been successful,' he said.
'I don't think so,' said Serpukhovsky again smiling. 'I won't tell you not to live without it, but it would be boring.'
Of course, I may be mistaken, but I think I have some abilities in the field I have chosen, and that I have power, whatever it may be, in my hands, better than in the hands of many known to me, &quot; Serpukhovska said with a radiant consciousness of success. 'And therefore, the closer I get to it, the more pleased I am.
'It may be so for you, but not for everyone.
I thought the same thing, but I live and find that it's not the only reason to live,' he said.
'This is it!
That's it! 'Laughing,' said Serpukhovsky. 'I started with what I heard about you, about your refusal...'
Of course I approved you.
But there's a manner to everything. And I think the best thing to do is you didn't do it right.
'What is done is done, and you know I never renounce what I have done.
And then I'm fine.
'Great -- for the time being.
But you're not satisfied with it. I'm not telling your brother.
It's a lovely child, just like our master.
There he is! 'He added, listening to the cry of a hooray,' and he had fun, and that's not what pleases you.
'I do not say that it is satisfactory.
'That's not one thing.
People like you are needed.
'To whom?
'To whom?
To the community.
Russia needs people, it needs a party, otherwise it goes to the dogs.
Bertenev Party against Russian Communists?
'No,' said Serpukhovsky, groaning over the fact that he was suspected of being so stupid. --Tout ca est une blague.
It's always been and always will be.
There are no communists.
But people always have to intrigue to make up a bad, dangerous party.
It's an old thing.
No, we need a party of independent people, like you and me.
'But why?' 'Vronsky has named several powerful men. 'But why aren't they independent people?'
'Only because they had no or no independence, no name, no proximity to the sun in which we were born.
You can buy them either with money or lazy. And to hold on, they have to come up with a direction.
And they're doing some thought, some direction that they don't believe in themselves, which does evil; and all this direction is just the means to have a house of execution and so much pay.
Cela n'est pas plus fin que ca, when you look at their cards.
Maybe I'm worse, stupider than them, even though I can't see why I should be worse than them.
But I may already have one important advantage, something that's harder to buy.
And people like that are more needed than ever.
He listened carefully, but not so much as to the content of the words, but rather to the case of Serpukhovsky, who was already thinking of fighting power and having his sympathy and apathy in it, while for him only the interests of the squadron were in his service.
He also understood how strong Serpukhovsky could be with his unmistakable ability to think, understand things, and understand things with his mind, and with the gift of a word, so rarely found in the environment in which he lived.
And as much as he was ashamed of it, he was jealous.
'I still lack one main thing for this,' he replied. 'The desire for power is lacking.
It was, but it passed.
'Excuse me, it is not true,' said Serpukhovsky, smiling.
'No, really, really! Now, 'To be sincere, he has added more.'
'Yeah, really, now it's different; but it won't always be.
'Perhaps,' replied Wronsky.
'You say maybe,' said Serpukhovsky, as if by guessing his thoughts, 'and I'm telling you, I think.
And that's why I wanted to see you. You did what you had to do.
I understand that, but you shouldn't be persevering.
I'm just asking you to cute blanche.
I don't patronise you...
Why should I not patronize you?
You've been patronizing me so many times!
I hope our friendship is better than this.
Yes,' he said gently, as a woman, smiling at him. 'Give me a carde blanche, get out of the shelf, and I'll drag you in.
'But you understand, I don't need anything,' he said, 'as soon as things were as they were.
Serpukhovsky stood up and opposed him.
'You said that things should be the way they were.'
I know what that means.
But listen, we are of equal age; perhaps you have more knowledge of women than I have. 'The smile and gestures of Serpukhovsky said that he should not be afraid that he would touch the sick place gently and carefully. 'But I am married, and believe that once you know one of your wives (as someone wrote), whom you love, you will know all the women better than if you knew thousands of them.
'We shall now come!' cried out to the Pharaoh's officer who looked into the room and called them to the regimental commander.
Now he wanted to hear what he had to say to him.
'And here's my opinion.
Women are the main stumbling block in human activity.
It's hard to love a woman and do something.
To do so, there is one means of being comfortable without interference with love: marriage.
How can you say what I think,' said Serpukhovsky, who loved comparisons, 'Wait, wait!
Yeah, how to carry a fronteau and do something with your hands only when the front is tied to your back -- and that's marriage.
And that's what I felt when I got married.
All of a sudden, I had my hands crossed.
But without getting married, you're gonna have to drag this fardeau -- your hands are gonna be so full that you can't do anything.
Look at Mazankov, Krupova.
They ruined their careers because of women.
'What women! 'Vronsky said, remembering the Frenchwoman and the actress with whom the two men had been associated.
'The worse, the stronger the position of the woman in light, the worse.
It's like pulling it out of someone else's hands isn't what it is.
'You have never loved,' he said quietly, looking before himself and thinking about Anna.
'Maybe.
But remember what I told you.
And women are more material than men. We do something huge out of love, and they're always terre-a-terre.
'Now, now!' he turned to the footman who entered.
But the footmen did not come to call them again, as he thought.
Lakei brought the Vronski note.
'The man brought you from Princess Tverska.
Wronsky printed the letter and went off.
'I have a headache, I will go home,' he said.
'Well, goodbye.
You're giving me a carde blanche?
'After we talk, I will find you in Petersburg.
It was the sixth hour, and therefore, in order to be on time and not to ride their horses, whom they all knew, he sat down in Yashwin's luxurious carriage and told him to go as quickly as possible.
The granny old four-seat carriage was spacious. He sat in a corner, pulled his legs to the front and thought.
The vague awareness of the clarity of his affairs, the vague memory of the friendship and flattery of Serpukhovsky, who considered him to be the right person, and, above all, the waiting for a date -- all came together as a general impression of a joyful sense of life.
The feeling was so strong that he smiled involuntarily.
He brought down his feet, laid one on the other's knee, and took her into his hand, and felt the palpable caviar of his feet that had fallen yesterday in the fall, and reclining back, sighed several times with his breasts.
"Okay, very good!" 'He said to himself.
He had often experienced a joyful mind of his body before, but he never loved himself as much as he did now.
It was good for him to feel this slight pain in his strong leg, and it was good for him to feel the movement of his chest while breathing.
The very clear and cold day of August, which acted so hopelessly on Anna, seemed to him to be exhilarating and refreshing his burning face and neck.
The smell of diamonds from his mustache seemed particularly pleasant in this fresh air.
Everything he saw in the window of the carriage, all in this cold, clean air, in this pale light of sunset was as fresh, funny and as much as he himself: the roofs of houses, shiny in the rays of the sun, and the sharp shapes of fences and corners of buildings, and the figures of rare pedestrians and crews, and the stationary greening of trees and grasses, and fields with properly cut potatoes, and the shadows falling from the houses and from the trees and from the bushes, and from the very beards of the potatoes. Everything was beautiful, like a beautiful landscape just finished and covered with varnish.
'Go, go!' he said to the coachman, sticking himself out the window, and, delivering a three-bore paper out of his pocket, he put it in a lookout.
The driver's hand felt something at the flashlight, heard a whip whistle, and the carriage quickly rolled along a smooth road.
"Nothing, I don't need anything but this happiness," he thought, looking at the patio of the belly between the windows and imagining Anna in the way he had seen her the last time. 'And the further away, the more I love her.'
Here's the garden of Vide's delivery.
Where is she?
Where?
How?
Why is she here on a date and writing in Betsy's letter?" 'He thought only now; but there was no time to think.'
He stopped the coachman without reaching the alley, and when he opened the door, he jumped out of the carriage and went into the alley leading to the house.
There was no one in the alley: but when he looked to the right, he saw her.
Her face was covered by a voil, but he took a joyous look with a special eye, with one characteristic movement of walking, a slope of her shoulders, and a position of her head, and immediately it was like an electric current running through his body. He felt with renewed strength himself, from the pulmonary movement of his legs to the movement of his lungs while breathing, and something tickled his lips.
When she joined him, she shook his hand.
'Aren't you angry that I called you?
I needed to see you,' she said; and the serious and hard lip store he saw under the veil immediately changed his mood.
'I am angry!
But how did you get here, where?
'It's all the same,' she said, putting her hand on him, 'come on, I need to have a word.
He realized something had happened and that it wouldn't be a happy date.
In her presence, he did not have his will: without knowing the cause of her anxiety, he already felt that the same alarm had been communicated to him involuntarily.
'What is it? What? 'He asked, pressing her hand and trying to read her thoughts in her face.'
She passed several steps silently, gathering with spirit, and suddenly stopped.
'I didn't tell you yesterday,' she began, breathing very hard, 'that when I returned home with Alexei Alexandrovich, I told him everything... said that I couldn't be his wife, that... that's all I said.
He listened to her, involuntarily bowing to the whole country, as if to alleviate her plight.
But as soon as she said it, he suddenly straightened out, his face took on a proud and strict expression. 'Yes, yes, it is better, a thousand times better! I understand how hard it was,' he said.
But she wouldn't listen to what he said, and she would read his thoughts on the face.
She could not have known that the expression of his face related to the first thought that had come up -- the inevitability of the present duel.
She never thought of a duel, so she explained this fleeting expression of severity differently.
When she received her husband's letter, she knew deep down that everything would remain the same, that she would not be able to neglect her position, abandon her son and join her lover.
The morning at Princess Tversky's, she was even more so.
But it was a very important date for her.
She was hoping this date would change their situation and save her.
If he says so with determination, passionately, without a moment of hesitation, he says to her, "Throw it all down and run with me!" She'll leave her son and leave with him.
But the news didn't bring him what she expected: he was only insulted by something.
'It wasn't hard for me at all. 'It was self-evident,' she said, annoying, 'and here...' she took her husband's letter out of her glove.
'I understand, I understand,' he interrupted it by accepting the letter, but without reading it and trying to calm it, 'I only wished for one thing, I asked, 'to break this provision in order to dedicate my life to your happiness.
'Why are you telling me this? 'She said.' 'Can I doubt that?
If I hadn't doubted...
'Who is this coming?' 'Wronsky said suddenly, pointing to two ladies who were walking toward them.' 'Perhaps they know us,' and he hastened to draw her behind him into the sidewalk.
'Oh, I don't care!' she said.
Her lips trembled. And it seemed to him that her eyes were staring at him from under the voil. 'So I say it's not that, I can't doubt it; but here's what he's writing to me.
Read it. 'She stopped again.
Again, as at the first minute, when she was told that she had broken up with her husband, when he read the letter, he willingly gave himself to the natural impression that he felt about the offended husband.
Now that he was holding his letter in his hand, he was suddenly imagining the challenge he would probably find today or tomorrow, and the duel, during which he would stand under the shot of an insulted husband with the cold and proud expression that he still had on his face when he shot in the air.
And then, in his head, the thought of what Serpukhovsky had just told him and that he himself had thought this morning -- that it was best not to bind himself -- and he knew that he could not convey that message to her.
When he read the letter, he looked at her, and his eyes were not firm.
She immediately realized that he had already thought about it with himself. She knew that whatever he told her, he wouldn't say everything he thought.
And she realized that her last hope had been deceived. It wasn't what she was waiting for.
'You see what kind of man he is,' she said with a trembling voice, 'he...
'I'm sorry, but I'm happy about it,' interrupted Vronsky. 'For God's sake, let me finish,' he added, begging her with his eyes to give him time to explain his words. 'I'm happy because it can't, it can't stay the way he thinks.'
'Why can't he? 'In holding back her tears,' said Anna, evidently no longer attaching any meaning to what he would say.
She felt that her fate had been resolved.
He wanted to say that, after the inevitable duel he believed, it could not continue, but he said otherwise.
'Can't go on.
I hope you leave him now.
I hope he's embarrassed and blushing that you're gonna let me set up and think about our lives tomorrow...' he started.
She didn't let him talk.
'And the son? 'She cried out.' 'Do you see what he's writing?' 'We have to leave him, and I can't and I don't want to do it.'
'But for God's sake, what is better?
Should I leave my son or continue this humiliating situation?
'Whose humiliation is it for?'
'For everyone and most of all for you.
'You say humiliating... don't say that. Those words make no sense to me,' she said with a trembling voice.
She didn't want him to lie now.
She had only one love left for him, and she wanted to love him. 'You realize that everything has changed since the day you fell in love with me.'
To me, one and the other is your love.
If it's mine, I feel so high, so firm, nothing can be humiliating to me.
I'm proud of my position because... I'm proud of... I'm proud of... 'She didn't tell me what he was proud of.
The tears of shame and despair strangled her voice, Oma stopped and wept.
He also felt something coming up to his throat, pinching his nose, and for the first time in his life he felt ready to cry.
He couldn't say what touched him; he felt sorry for her, felt he couldn't help her, yet knew that he was the wine of her misfortune, that he had done something bad.
'Isn't a divorce impossible? 'He said weakly.'
She didn't answer, she shook her head. 'Can't you take your son and leave him?
'Yes; but it all depends on him.
Now I have to go to him,' she said, dry.
Her feeling that everything would stay the same didn't deceive her.
'On Tuesday I will be in Petersburg, and it will be settled.'
'Yes,' she said. 'But let's not talk about it again.
Anna's carriage, which she sent and told her to come to the bars of the garden of Vreda, arrived.
Anna said goodbye to him and went home.
Monday was the usual meeting of the commission on 2 June.
Aleksey Alexandrovich entered the meeting room, said hello to the members and the chairman, as usual, and sat in his seat, putting his hand on the papers he had prepared before him.
Among those documents was the information he needed and the outline of the statement he intended to make.
He didn't need a background check, though.
He remembered everything and didn't think it was necessary to say what he would say in his memory.
He knew that when the time came, and when he saw the face of the enemy, in vain, trying to express himself indifferently, his speech would come out better than he could now prepare.
He felt that the content of his speech was so great that every word would matter.
In the meantime, having heard the usual report, he had the most innocent, harmless look.
No one thought, looking at his white ones with their hands swollen, so softly long that they felt both sides of the white paper lying in front of him, and at him with the expression of fatigue on the side of his bent head, that he was about to make such speeches out of his mouth that would make a terrible storm, make the members scream, interrupting each other, and the chairman demand order.
When the report came to an end, he announced in a quiet, subtle voice that he had some of his views on the alien scheme. Attention turned to him.
Alexey Alexandrovich coughed up and, without looking at his opponent, chose, as he had always done in his speeches, the first person sitting in front of him, a humble little old man who had never had any opinion in the commission, began to express his views.
When it came to indigenous and organic law, the enemy jumped up and began to object.
Stremov, also a member of the commission and also hurt for the living, began to justify himself, &quot; and there was a stormy meeting at all &quot; ; but Alexei Alexandrovich was triumphant and his proposal was accepted; three new commissions were appointed; and on the other day, in a well-known peterburg circle, there was only talk of this meeting.
Alexey Alexandrovich's success was even greater than he expected.
On Tuesday morning, when he woke up, he was happy to remember yesterday's victory and could not help but smile, even though he wanted to seem indifferent when the governor of the office, in order to flatter him, reported the rumours that had occurred before him at the commission.
In dealing with the ruler of the office, he completely forgot that it was now Tuesday, the day he had appointed to visit Anna Arkadievna, and was surprised and disheartened when a man came to report her.
Anna arrived in Petersburg early in the morning; she was followed by a carriage by means of her telegram, so Alexi Alexandrovich might have been aware of her arrival.
But when she arrived, he didn't meet her.
She was told he wasn't out yet, and he's working with the president of the office.
She told her husband that she had come and gone to her office and had taken care of her things, waiting for him to come to her.
But it's been an hour, he didn't come.
She went out to the dining room under the pretext of an order and spoke on purpose, expecting him to come here; but he did not come out, even though she heard that he had gone out to the door of the office to see the governor of the office.
She knew that he was usually going to leave the service soon, and she wanted to see him before that, so that their relationship would be defined.
She walked through the hall and went to him with determination.
When she walked into his office, he was in a Vismundir, apparently ready to leave, sitting at the little table on which he had turned his hands and looked down in front of him.
She saw him before he saw her, and she realized what he was thinking about her.
When he saw her, he wanted to get up, thought, and then his face flashed, which Anna had never seen before, and he quickly stood up and met her, looking not into her eyes, but above her forehead and hair.
He went up to her, took her hand and asked her to sit down.
'I am very glad that you have come,' he said, sitting beside her, and apparently wanting to say something, he stumbled.
He wanted to start talking a few times, but he stopped...
Although preparing for this date, she taught herself to despise and blame him, she did not know what to say to him and felt sorry for him.
And so the silence went on for quite some time. 'Serezha is well? 'He said, and he added, without waiting for an answer, 'I will not eat at home today, and now I have to go.'
'I wanted to go to Moscow,' she said.
'No, you did very, very well to come,' he said, and again you were silent.
Seeing that he couldn't start talking on his own, she started on her own.
'Alexei Alexandrovich,' she said, looking at him and keeping an eye on him with his eye on her hair, 'I am a criminal woman, I am a bad woman, but I am what I said to you then, and I came to tell you that I can't change anything.
'I didn't ask you about it,' he said, suddenly looking her straight in the eye with determination and hatred, 'I thought so. 'It seems that under the influence of anger he once again mastered all his abilities. 'But, as I told you then,' he said in a sharp, thin voice, 'I now repeat that I do not have to know.
I'm ignoring it. Not all wives are as kind as you are to be in such a hurry to give such pleasant news to their husbands. 'He especially hit the word "charming." 'I ignore it until the light knows it, until my name is disgraced.
And so I'm just warning you that our relationship has to be what it's always been, and that only if you compromise yourself will I have to take steps to protect my honor.
'But our relationship cannot be as it always is,' Anna spoke with a shy voice, looking at him with fear.
When she saw these calm gestures again, she heard this piercing, childish and ridiculous voice, and aversion to him destroyed her previous pity, and she was only afraid, but in no way wanted to understand her situation.
'I cannot be your wife when I...' she began.
He laughed at evil and cold laughter.
'The kind of life you chose must have affected your notions.
I respect or despise both... I respect your past and despise the present... that I was far from the interpretation you gave me.
Anna sighed and dropped her head.
'I don't understand, however, how, having as much independence as you,' he continued, in a heated manner, 'by declaring to his husband his infidelity and not finding anything reprehensible in it, do you seem to find the execution of his wife's duty to his husband reprehensible?
'Alexei Alexandrovich! What do you want from me?
'I need that I do not meet this man here and that you behave in such a way that neither the light nor the servants can blame you... lest you see him.'
I don't think that's much.
And for that, you will enjoy the rights of an honest wife without fulfilling her duties.
That's all I have to say to you.
Now it's time for me to go.
I don't eat at home.
He stood up and headed towards the door.
Anna stood up, too. He bowed silently and missed her.
The night that Levin spent on a cop did not pass for him a gift: the farm that he was leading was opposed to him, and he lost all interest in him. Despite an excellent harvest, there has never been, or at least never seemed to him, as many failures and as many hostile relations between him and the men as this year, and the reasons for the failures and this hostility have now been fully understood by him.
The beauty he had experienced in the work itself, which resulted from the convergence with the men, the envy he felt for them, the envy he felt for them, the desire to move into this life, which on that night was no longer a dream for him, but the intention that he thought of doing so in such a way changed his view of his own household, that he could no longer find any previous interest in him, nor could he fail to see the unpleasant attitude he had towards his workers, which was the basis of the whole case. The herd of improved cows, like Pava, all fertilized, ploughed land, nine equal fields planted with vines, ninety tithes of deep-smelled manure, private seedlings, etc. 'All this would be fine if it were done only by him or him with his comrades, with people who sympathize with him.'
But he saw clearly now (his work on the agricultural book, in which the main element of the farm should have been an employee, much helped him in doing so) -- he now clearly saw that the farm he was running was only a violent and persistent struggle between him and the workers, in which on one side, on his side, there was a constant intense desire to transform everything into the considered best model, on the other hand, the natural order of things. And in this struggle, he saw that, with the greatest strain on his part, and without any effort or even intention on the other side, the only thing that had been achieved was that the economy had been in no one's hands and that beautiful weapons, beautiful beasts and land had been destroyed in vain.
The important thing is that not only did the energy for the cause go completely to waste, but he couldn't help but feel now that his farm was exposed to him, that the purpose of his energy was the most unworthy. In fact, what was the struggle?
He stood for every penny of his own (and couldn't help but stand, because he had to loosen up his energy, and he wouldn't have enough money to pay the workers) and they just stood up for working in peace and pleasure, which is how they used to be. It was in his interest that every worker should work as much as possible, not forgetting to try not to break the wands, horse burglaries, hammers, to think about what he was doing; the employee wanted to work as pleasantly as possible, with rest, and most importantly, carelessly and forgetting without thinking.
This summer Levin saw it every step of the way. He sent the clover to the hay, choosing the bad tithes that had grown out of grass and mud, which were bad for the seeds -- he was being downloaded by the best seed tithes in a row, justified by what the orderman had ordered, and comforted him by the fact that the hay would be great; but he knew that it was because these tithes were easier to mow.
He sent a hay-wire to shake the hay -- it was broken in the front row, because it was boring for a man to sit on goats under his waving wings. And it was said to him, "Don't worry, the women are freaking out."
The ponds proved to be distasteful, because the worker did not think to put down the incisor raised up, and grumbled with his power, he tormented the horses, and ruined the ground; and he was asked to be dead. The horses were launched into wheat because no worker wanted to be a night watchman, and despite orders not to do so, the workers alternated to guard the night, and Wanka, after working all day, fell asleep and repented of his sin, saying, "Your will."
Three of the best chicks were fed because without water, they let them into the clover, and they didn't want to believe they were blown up by a clover, but told in comfort as a neighbor had a hundred and twelve heads in three days.
All of this was done not because someone wanted to harm Levin or his household; on the contrary, he knew that he had been loved, was regarded as a mere barin (which is the highest praise); but it was done only because he wanted to work fun and carelessly, and his interests were not only alien and incomprehensible, but fatally opposed to their most just interests.
Levin had long been displeased with his attitude toward the household. He saw his boat running, but he didn't find or look for leaks, maybe deliberately deceiving himself.
But now he couldn't fool himself anymore. Not only did he not care about the farm, but it was disgusting, and he could no longer do it.
The presence of Kitty Scherbatsky in his 30s, which he wanted and could not see, added to this.
Daria Alexandrovna Oblonsky, when he was with her, asked him to come, to come to renew the offer to her sister, who, as she had let her feel, would now accept him.
Levin himself, seeing Kitty Shcherbatsky, realized that he had not stopped loving her; but he could not go to Oblonsky, knowing that she was there.
That he proposed to her, and she refused him, put an irresistible barrier between him and her.
"I can't ask her to be my wife because she can't be the wife of whoever she wanted," he said to himself.
The thought of it made him cold and hostile to her.
"I will not be able to speak to her without a feeling of reproach, to look at her without anger, and she will only hate me even more as she should be.
And then, how can I now, after what Daria Alexandrovna told me to do, go to them?
Can I not show you that I know what she told me?
And I will come with generosity -- to forgive her, to pardon her.
I am in front of her as a forgiving and loving man!
Why did Daria Alexandrovna say that to me?
I wish I could have seen her, and then everything would have turned out to be, but now it's impossible, it's impossible!"
Daria Alexandrovna sent him a note asking him for a lady's saddle for Kitty.
"I was told you had a saddle," she wrote to him. 'I hope you bring him yourself.'
He couldn't bear it anymore.
How a smart, delicate woman could so humiliate her sister!
He wrote ten notes and tore it up and sent a saddle without any answer.
Write that he's coming -- you can't, because he can't come; you can't say he can't come because he can't, because he can't, or he's leaving -- that's even worse.
He sent the saddle without answer and conscious that he had done something embarrassing, but on the other day, after handing over the rest of the land to the orderman, he went to a far-off village to his friend Sviyazhsky, who was surrounded by beautiful bogs and who had recently written to him, asking him to fulfil his long-standing intention to visit him.
Dupelin marshes in Surov County have long seduced Levin, but he has kept his business busy and postponed the trip.
Now, however, he was happy to leave Scherbatsky's neighborhood and, above all, the farm, to hunt, which in all his sorrows served him as the best comfort.
There was neither a railway nor a postage road in the county of Surovsk, and Levin was riding in his tarantas.
On half the road, he stopped feeding a rich man.
A bald, fresh old man with a big red beard, gray by his cheeks, opened the gate, clinging to the faith to miss the three.
After pointing out a place under the curtain on a large, clean, and cleaned new court with burnt owls, the old man asked Levin to go upstairs.
Purely dressed young woman, with her barefoot caps on her leg, bent down and wiped the floor with new hay.
She was afraid of the dog running after Levin and cried out, but immediately laughed at her fear when she learned that the dog would not touch.
When she showed Levin her hand on the door to the chamber, she hid her beautiful face again, bent down, and kept washing.
'Samvar, is it?' 'She asked.'
'Yes, please.
The garage was big, with a Dutch oven and a partition.
Under the images was a painting table, a shop, and two chairs.
There was a dish locker outside.
The stakes were closed, the flies were few, and it was so clear that Levin made sure that Laska, who was running on the road and swimming in the puddles, would not smash the floor, and indicated to her a place in the corner by the door.
When Levin looked around the tower, he went out into the backyard.
A pious young woman in the cuffs, swinging empty buckets on the coroms, ran in front of him for water to the well.
'Now I have!' cried the old man at her funnyly and approached Levin. 'What, sir, are you going to Nikolai Ivanovichski?'
And they're coming to see us, too,-- he started to say a word, leaning back on the porch railing.
In the middle of the old man's story of his acquaintance with the Sviyazh gate, the squeaks were again squeaked, and the workers from the field came into the yard with mooses and borons.
The horse's hounds and borons were full and large.
The workers were apparently family members: two were young, two were wearing white shirts and cardboards, and the other two were hired, and one was old, and the other was young. As he walked away from the porch, the old man went up to the horses and began to spread out.
'What was that?' 'I asked Levin.'
'The potatoes were smelling.'
We're holding the ground, too.
You, Fedot, don't let the meringue in, but put something else on the well.
'What, Father, did I order the tails to take, bring them, or what?' 'Asked a great height, a big boy, apparently the son of an old man.
'In... in the sled,' answered the old man, running around with the loosed leaders and throwing them on the ground. 'Fix it, they'll have lunch.'
A good - looking young woman with full shoulders pulled out of her shoulders in the hay.
There are women from somewhere else -- young, beautiful, medium and old, ugly, with and without children.
The samurai chewed in the trumpet; the workers and the family went out with the horses and went to lunch.
Levin brought his provisions out of the wheelchair, and invited the old man with him to drink tea.
'Yes, we have already been drinking,' said the old man, apparently with pleasure accepting the offer. 'It's not for the company.
After tea, Levin learned the whole story of an old man's farm.
The old man filmed a hundred twenty-ten from the housekeeper ten years ago, and last year he bought them and filmed another 300 from the next landowner.
The smallest part of the earth, the worst part of it, he gave out the hires, and tithing forty in the field smelled of his own family and two hired workers.
The old man complained it wasn't going well.
Levin realized, however, that he had complained only out of decency and that his household had flourished.
Had it been bad, he wouldn't have bought a hundred and five rubles of land, married three sons and a nephew, built twice after the fires, and everything was better and better.
Despite the old man &apos; s complaints, it appeared that he was justly proud of his wealth, proud of his sons, nephew, daughters-in-law, horses, cows and, in particular, of holding on to the whole household.
In a conversation with an old man, Levin learned that he had not been away from innovation.
He sowed a lot of potatoes, and his potatoes, which Levin saw when he drove up, were already blooming and sober, whereas Levin had only blossomed.
He smelled like plough potatoes, as he called a plow taken from a landowner.
He was spreading wheat.
A little detail about the fact that when the old man was missing, he was feeding the horses with a peanut face, and he was particularly struck by Levin.
How many times Levin, seeing this lost fine food, wanted to gather it; but it always proved impossible.
The man did it, and he couldn't brag about it.
'What shall the women do?'
They're gonna take the piles to the road, and the cart's gonna come.
'Oh, we're having a bad time with the workers,' said Levin, giving him a cup of tea.
'Thank you,' answered the old man, taking a glass, but giving up sugar, pointing to the rest of the lump he had chewed. 'Where do you deal with the workers?' 'He said.' 'Observe one.
I wish I had Sviyazhskov.
We know the land, the poppy, and we don't brag too much about crops.
It's all an oversight!
'You're the boss of the workers, aren't you?'
'Our business is manly.'
We're on our own.
It's bad, we're out, and we're gonna do ours.
'Father, Finogen told me to get the money,' said the woman in the cuffs.
'That's right, sir!' said the old man, standing up, crossed over for a long time, thanked Levin and came out.
When Levin entered the blackout to summon his coachman, he saw the whole family of men at the table.
The women were standing up.
A young, big son, with a mouth full of porridge, said something funny, and everyone laughed, and in particular a funny woman in claps who put her neck in a cup.
It may very well be that the good-looking face of the woman in the caps contributed greatly to the impression of the improvement that the peasant house had made on Levin, but the impression was so strong that Levin could never get away from him.
And all the way from the old man to Sviyazhsky, no, and I thought about this farm again, as if something in that impression required his special attention.
Sviyazhsky was the leader in his village.
He was five years older than Levin and long married.
His young sister-in-law, a very pretty girl, lived in his house.
Levin knew that Sviyazhsky and his wife were very eager to marry him to this girl.
He knew that without a doubt, as the young men, the so-called grooms, have always known, although he would never have said it to anyone, and he also knew that, despite the fact that he wanted to get married, despite the fact that, according to all accounts, this very attractive girl was supposed to be a beautiful wife, he could not marry her, even if he was not in love with Kitty Scherbatsky, how to fly to heaven.
And that knowledge poisoned him with the pleasure he hoped to have from the journey to Sviyazhsky.
After receiving a letter from Sviyazhsky inviting him to the hunt, Levin immediately thought about it, but nevertheless decided that such views on him were only his unfounded assumption, and therefore he would go.
Also, deep down, he wanted to test himself, try again on this girl.
Sviyazhsky's home life was extremely pleasant, and Sviyazhsky himself, the best type of earthly figure Levin ever knew, was always extremely interesting to Levin.
Sviyazhsky was one of those who was always amazing to Levin, whose reasoning, which is very consistent, though never independent, goes on in itself, and life, which is extremely certain and firm in its direction, goes on in itself, completely independent and almost always at odds with reasoning.
Sviyazhsky was an extremely liba-- real.
He despised the nobles and considered the majority of the nobles to be secret, only unspoken and fortified.
He considered Russia to be a dead country, like Turkey, and Russia's government to be so bad that it never allowed itself to even seriously criticize the government's actions, yet he served and was a model noble leader, and he always wore a cocard and a red cap.
He believed that human life was possible only abroad, where he went to live at the earliest opportunity, but also led a very complex and improved economy in Russia and followed with extreme interest everything and knew everything that had been done in Russia.
He thought a Russian man was in the transition from a monkey to a man, but in the land elections he was more likely to shake hands with the men and listen to their opinions...
He did not believe in chao or death, but was very concerned about the improvement of the clergy and the reduction of parishes, especially with the church staying in his village.
On the issue of women, he was on the side of the extreme supporters of women &apos; s full freedom, and especially their right to work, but lived with the woman in a way that everyone admired their friendly, childless family life, and arranged the life of her wife so that she could do nothing but share a common concern with her husband, how to have a better and more fun time.
If Levin did not have the ability to explain to himself on the best side, Sviyazhsky's character would not have presented him with any difficulty or question; he would have said to himself, "A fool or a jerk, and everything would have been clear. "
But he couldn't say a fool, because Sviyazhsky was certainly not only very smart, but very educated and extraordinaryly just an educated person.
There was no thing he did not know, but he showed his knowledge only when we forced him to do so.
Even less could Levin have said that he was a crap, because Sviyazhsky was undoubtedly an honest, kind, intelligent man who had fun, lively, constantly doing a work that everyone around him appreciated, and probably had never consciously done or could have done anything wrong.
Levin tried to understand and did not understand and always looked at him and his life as a living mystery.
They were friends with Levin, so Levin allowed himself to test Sviyazhsky, to get to the very foundation of his view of life; but it was always futile.
Every time Levin tried to enter beyond the open doors of the reception rooms of Sviyazhsky's mind, he noticed that Sviyazhsky was a little confused; a slight fear expressed in his eyes, as if he feared that Levin would understand him, and he gave a kind and fun fight.
Now, after his disappointment in the household, Levin was particularly pleased to visit Sviyazhsky.
Not to mention that he was having fun looking at these happy, happy, and all the doves, their well-established nest, he now wanted to feel so displeased with his life, to get to Sviyazhsky to the secret that gave him such clarity, certainty and fun in life.
In addition, Levin knew what he would see from Sviyazh's roommates, and he was now particularly interested in talking, hearing about the farm, talking about crops, hiring workers, etc., which Levin knew was considered to be very low, but which now seemed very important to Levin.
"It may not have mattered under serf law or in England.
In both cases, the most basic conditions have been defined; but now that all of this has been reversed and is settled, the question of how these conditions will be met is only one important question in Russia," Levin thought.
The hunt was worse than Levin expected.
The swamp's dry, and there were no dope at all.
He spent the whole day and brought only three grand, but he brought, as always from hunting, a great appetite, a great spirit attitude, and a hot mental state, which was always accompanied by a strong physical movement.
And on the hunt, at a time when he didn't seem to think of anything, no, no, and again he was reminded of an old man with his family, and it seemed like it required not only attention, but also permission to do something about him.
In the evening, tea, in the presence of two dumpsters who had come on some sort of custody business, began the very interesting conversation Levin expected.
Levin sat beside the lady at the tea table, and was to speak to her and her sister-in-law, sitting against him.
The hostess was a round-faced, blonde, and small woman, all shiny with pits and smiles.
Levin tried through her to find a solution to the important mystery that her husband represented for him; but he did not have complete freedom of thought, because he was incredibly uncomfortable.
It was painfully embarrassing to him that his sister-in-law was sitting against him in a special dress for him, which seemed to him to be special in the form of a trapeze of a cut on a white breast; this quadriang cut, despite the fact that the breast was very white, or especially because it was very white, deprived Levin of his freedom of thought.
He thought it was probably a mistake that the cut was made on his account, and he felt that he had no right to look at it and tried not to look at it; but he felt guilty for one thing that the cut was made.
Levin felt that he was lying to someone, that he should explain something, but that there was no way to explain it, and therefore he was blushing, troubled, and embarrassed.
The awkwardness of him was communicated to his pretty sister-in-law. But the hostess didn't seem to notice it and deliberately dragged her into the conversation.
'You say,' continued the mistress of the conversation, 'that the husband cannot be interested in all Russians.
On the contrary, he's fun abroad, but never the way he is here.
This is where he feels in his field.
He's got so much to do, and he's got the gift to be interested in everyone.
Oh, you weren't at our school?
'I have seen...
It's an ivy cottage, isn't it?
'Yes, it is Nastino's business,' she said, pointing to her sister.
'Do you teach yourself? 'I asked Levin, trying to look past the cut, but feeling that wherever he looked in that direction, he would see the cut.'
'Yes, I taught and taught myself, but we have a wonderful teacher.
And we introduced gymnastics.
'No, I thank you, I don't want any more tea,' said Levin, and feeling that he was making a lack of respect, but that he could no longer continue this conversation, blushing, stood up. 'I hear a very interesting conversation,' he added, and came to the other end of the table, where the owner was sitting with the two invaders.
Sviyazhsky sat side by side to the table, with her hands on the back, turning the cup around, giving out one another, as if she were sniffing.
He looked right at a hot dumpster with gray mustaches and apparently found fun in his speeches.
The landowner complained about the people.
It was clear to Levin that Sviyazhsky knew such a response to the complaints of the landowner, who would immediately destroy the whole meaning of his speech, but that by his position he could not say the answer and listen without the pleasure of the comic speech of the landowner.
The landowner with the gray mustache was apparently a long - lived forerunner and a village elder, a passionate rural master.
Levin also saw these signs in his clothes -- an old-fashioned, worn-out hood, apparently an unusual dumpster, and in his smart, frowny eyes, and in his folded Russian speech, and in his military, apparently long experience of a great tone, and in the decisive movements of large, beautiful, tanned hands with one old wedding ring in a nameless place.
'Only if it hadn't been a pity to give up that a lot of work had been done...' said the landowner with his clever old face with a pleasant smile.
'Don't throw it away,' said Nikolai Ivanovich Sviyazhsky, 'it seems there are calculations.
'The only calculation is that I live at home, unpurchased, unhired.'
You're still hoping the people will understand.
Or you believe it -- it's drunk, it's debauchery!
Everyone's changed, no horses, no cows.
You'll starve to death, and you'll have to hire him -- he's gonna screw you up, he's gonna screw you up, and he's gonna go to the justice of the peace.
'But you will also complain to the justice of the peace,' said Sviyazhsky.
'Shall I complain?'
No way in the world!
Talking's gonna be like this, and I'm not happy to complain!
At the factory, they took the deposit, left.
What about the justice of the peace?
That's all he's got to do, and that's all he's got to do.
This one's gonna kick him out the old-fashioned way.
Don't be like that -- drop everything! Run to the end of the world!
Apparently, the landlord teased Sviyazhsky, but Sviyazhsky wasn't only angry, but apparently amused by it.
'Well, we are pursuing our economy without these measures,' he said, smiling, 'I, Levin, are they. He pointed out another landowner.
'Yes, Michael Petrovich is coming, and ask him how?
Is this a rational economy? 'The landowner said, obviously wearing the word `rational'.
'I have a simple economy,' said Mikhail Petrovich. 'Thank God.
All I have to do is make the money for the fall gifts ready.
The men come: Father, Father, let's go!
Well, all the guys in the neighborhood are pathetic. Well, if you give me a third, just say, remember, guys, I've helped you, and you'll help when you need it -- if you plant oatmeal, clean hay, reap, and you're gonna get rid of it.
I mean, they're useless, too, it's true.
Levin, aware of these patriarchal practices long ago, looked at Sviyazhsky and interrupted Mikhail Petrovich, turning again to a dungeon with a gray mustache.
'So what do you think?' 'He asked,' he said, 'how is the business to run now?
'It's as good as Michael Petrovich: either to give the sausage, or to hire the men; it is possible, but only by doing so will the common wealth of the state be destroyed.'
Where I have land with hard labour and a good household that brought you nine, it will bring samurai.
Destroyed Russia's emancipation!
Sviyazhsky looked at Levin with smiling eyes, and even made him a slight mocking sign: but Levin did not find the words of the lander to be funny,' he understood them more than he understood Sviyazhsky.
Much of what the landowner said next, proving why Russia was destroyed by emancipation, seemed very faithful to him, new and incontrovertible to him.
The landlord apparently spoke of his own thought, that it was so rare, and the thought he had been given was not a desire to take on something idle, but a thought that grew out of his living conditions, which he sat out in his village seclusion and thought about from all sides.
'In fact, let us see that all progress is made only by power,' he said, evidently wanting to show that he is not a stranger to education. 'Take the reforms of Peter, Catherine, Alexandra.
Take European history.
All the more so, progress in farming.
At least the potatoes -- and it was introduced into us by force.
'Cause you didn't always smell the juice, either.
And they brought her in, perhaps with good fortune, but they must have injected her by force.
Now, in our time, we landlords, under the serf's law, have managed our farm with improvements; and dryers, twigs, dung, and all the tools -- all of us have put in our power, and the men have first resisted and then imitated us.
Now, in the destruction of serf law, we have been taken away from power, and our economy, where it is raised to a high level, must go down to the wildest, most primal state.
So I understand...
'Why not?'
If it is rational, you can hire it,' said Sviyazhsky.
'There is no authority.'
Who am I going to lead him? Let me ask you something.
"This is the labour force, the main element of the economy," Levin thought.
'The workers. &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;/i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt;
'The workers do not want to work well and to work with good tools.
There's only one thing our worker knows -- getting drunk like a pig, drunk, and ruining everything you give him.
The horses will drink, the good ones will cut off, the tires will change, drink, the hammer will let the jackpot in to break it.
He's sick to see anything that's not his.
That's what brought down the whole level of the farm.
The earth is abandoned, sunflowered or distributed to men, and where millions were produced, it produces hundreds of thousands of quarters; the overall wealth has declined.
If they'd done the same thing, and even if they'd done it...
And he began to develop his liberation plan, which would remove these inconveniences.
Levin was not interested in this, but when he finished, Levin returned to his first position and said, turning to Sviyazhsky and trying to summon him to express his serious opinion:
'The fact that the level of the farm is falling and that in our relations with the workers it is not possible to lead a profitable sustainable economy is quite fair,' he said.
'I don't find it,' said Sviyazhsky very seriously, 'I can only see that we do not know how to run a farm and, on the contrary, that the farm we led under serf law is not too high, but too low.
We don't have cars, we don't have good livestock, we don't have real control, we don't know how to count.
Ask the owner -- he doesn't know what's good for him, what's bad for him.
'Italian accounting,' said the ironic landowner. 'Whatever you think you're gonna get messed up, there's not gonna be a mistress.'
'Why would they do that?'
The shitty hammer, the Russian top is yours, it's gonna break, and my steam isn't gonna break.
It's a racehorse, what's that? You're gonna get ruined by the tuscan rock that's behind your tail, and you're gonna get persherons or bitches, and they're not gonna get messed up.
That's it. We need to raise the farm upstairs.
'Would be of what, Nikolai Ivanovich!
You're fine, and I'm a son at the university, and I want you to raise the kids at the gym, so I can't buy any persherons.
'And these are the banks.'
'To sell the last of the hammer?'
No, thank you!
'I do not agree that it is necessary and possible to raise the level of the farm even higher,' said Levin. 'I'm doing it, and I have the means, and I couldn't do anything.
Banks don't know who they're good for.
I've spent at least nothing on the farm, everything's a waste: the bastard's a loss, the car's a loss.
'That is true,' even laughed at with pleasure, confirmed the landowner with the gray mustache.
'And I am not alone,' Levin continued, 'I will refer to all the owners who are rationally involved; all, with few exceptions, are doing business for loss.
Well, would you say that your farm is profitable? 'O Levin said, and immediately in the sight of Sviyazhsky Levin noticed that fleeting expression of fear that he had noticed when he wanted to go beyond the reception rooms of Sviyazhsky's mind.
Moreover, Levin's question was not entirely helpful.
The owner of tea just told him that they had invited from Moscow this summer a German expert in accounting who, for 500 rubles of remuneration, took their farm into account and found it to be a loss of three thousand rubles.
She didn't remember exactly how much, but I think the German counted to a quarter of a penny.
The landlord, when referring to the benefits of Sviyazhsky's farm, smiled, apparently, knowing what a lady neighbor and chief might have been.
'Maybe it's not good,' replied Sviyazhsky. 'It only proves that I'm a bad owner, or that I'm spending capital on increasing rent.'
'Ah, rent! 'Scaredly cried Levin.' 'Maybe there's a rent in Europe, where the land is better off from its labor, but we're getting worse from our labor, that is, what it will suffer,' so there's no rent.
'How come there's no rent?
It's the law.
'Then we are illegal: the rent will not explain anything to us, but, on the contrary, it will confuse us.
No, you tell me how the teaching of rent can be...
'Would you like sparrows?'
Masha, send us squatters or raspberries here,' he turned to his wife. 'Today the raspberry hangs out wonderfully late.
And in the most pleasant position of the spirit, Sviyazhsky stood up and retreated, apparently assuming that the conversation was over in the very place where Levin felt that he was just beginning.
Without an interviewer, Levin continued his conversation with the landowner, trying to prove to him that all the difficulty was caused by the fact that we did not want to know the characteristics, habits of our worker; but the lander was, like all people, self-evident and isolated, a lack of understanding of another's thoughts, and was particularly partial to his own.
He insisted that a Russian man is a pig and loves swine, and in order to get him out of the pigs, it takes power, and it doesn't, it needs a stick, and we've become so liberal that we replace a thousand-year-old stick with some kind of lawyer and detention, where bad-ass stinking men are fed good soup and counted them cube feet of air.
'Why do you think,' said Levin, trying to get back to the question, 'that there can be no attitude towards the workforce in which the work is productive?
'Never will it happen to the Russian people!
There is no authority,' answered the landowner.
'How can new conditions be found? 'Sviyazhsky said, singing with squatters, stabbing the papyros, and coming back to the quarrelers.' 'All possible attitudes to the workforce have been defined and explored,' he said. 'The remainder of barbarism -- a primal community with a circular arm is itself disintegrating, the serf law has been destroyed, only free labour remains, and its forms are defined and ready and must be taken.
Batrac, daily, farmer -- and you're not coming out of this.
'But Europe is displeased with these forms.
'I'm not happy and I'm looking for new ones.
And he'll probably find it.
'All I'm saying is,' answered Levin. 'Why don't we look for our side?'
'Cause it's like imagining new techniques for building railways.
They're ready, they're made up.
'But if we don't have them, if they're stupid?' 'Said Levin.'
Again, he saw the expression of fear in the eyes of Sviyazhsky.
'Yes, this is: We throw hats, we find what Europe is looking for!
I know all this, but if you'll excuse me, do you know everything that has been done in Europe on the issue of workers?
'No, it's bad.
'This question is now occupied by the best minds in Europe.
Schultze-Delichevian direction...
Then all this huge literature on the working question, the most liberal Lassalian direction...
The Milgausen device is a fact, you know.
'I have a concept, but very vague.
'No, you're just saying; you certainly know it as well as I do.
I'm not a social professor, of course, but I was interested, and, right, if you're interested, you'll take care of it.
'But what did they come to?'
'It's my fault...'
The lodgers stood up, and Sviyazhsky, again stopping Levin in his unpleasant habit of looking into what was behind his mind reception rooms, went out to see his guests.
Levin was insufferably bored this evening with the ladies: he was more concerned than ever that the displeasure he now had was not his exclusive position, but the general condition of the Russian case that the setting up of some kind of worker relationship where they worked, like a man on half the road, was not a dream, but a task that needed to be resolved.
He felt that the task could and should be addressed.
After saying goodbye to the ladies and promising to spend the rest of the day tomorrow in order to ride together to see an interesting failure in the casin forest, Levin entered the master's office before bed to take the books on the working issue that Sviyazhsky had offered him.
Sviyazhsky's office was a huge room, with bookcases and two tables, one massive written in the middle of the room, and another round, folded, stared around the lamp, in different languages by the last numerals of newspapers and magazines.
There was a counter at the desk with gold-lined boxes of various kinds of business.
Sviyazhsky got the books and sat in a rocking chair.
'What are you watching? 'He said to Levin, who stopped at the round table and looked at the magazines.
'Yes, it is a very interesting article,' said Sviyazhsky, about the magazine Levin held in his hands. 'It turns out,' he added with joy, 'that the main culprit of Poland's division was not Friedrich at all.
Turns out...
And he was very clear about these new, very important and interesting discoveries.
Even though Levin was now the most concerned with the idea of the farm, he listened to the owner and asked himself, "What's in it?
And why, why is he interested in the division of Poland?"
When Sviyazhsky finished, Levin inadvertently asked, "Well, what?" But nothing happened.
It was just interesting what it was.
But Sviyazhsky did not explain or find it necessary to explain why he was interested.
'Yes, but I was very interested in the angry landowner,' said Levin, sighing. 'He's smart and he's been telling a lot of truth.
'Oh, come on!